src/fst/stems/adverbs.lexd
##TODO write comments

LEXICON Adv_Root ##TODO Alphabetize
man # "also"
gid # "very"
pa # "more, yet"
na # "already"
lang # "only"
lamang # "only"
daw # "like"
bisan # "even"
karon # "now, later"
dayon # "immediately"
naman # "again"
subong # "now, current"
samtang # "while"
liwat # "again"
anay # "first"
